Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB198.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 15.800 TO 15.876 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Each employee of the Department of Child Support Services within the
Department of Law, including contract staff, with access to or use of federal tax
information shall submit to a criminal background investigation by means of a
fingerprint check by the Department of Kentucky State Police and the Federal
Bureau of Investigation.
(2) The results of the national and state criminal background checks shall be sent to
the Attorney General.
(3) The Department of Law may register employees or contract staff in the rap back
system.
(4) Any fee charged by the Department of Kentucky State Police or for the Federal
Bureau of Investigation background check or enrollment in the rap back system
shall be an amount no greater than the actual cost of processing the request and
conducting the background check.
(5) The Department of Law shall promulgate administrative regulations in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to implement this section.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 15 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "State agency" means any department, board, commission, institution,
division, office, organized body, or other functional group that is authorized
by the Constitution of Kentucky or the laws of this Commonwealth to
exercise, perform, or discharge any executive, legislative, judicial, or
administrative jurisdiction, powers, duties, rights, or obligations of state
Page 1 of 10
BR103500.100 - 1035 - XXXX 3/11/2026 3:18 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1035
government; and
(b) "Records" means:
1. Any document or electronically stored information, including writings,
drawings, graphs, charts, photographs, sound recordings, images, and
other data or data compilations stored in any medium from which
information can be obtained either directly or, if necessary, after
translation by the responding party into a reasonably usable form;
2. Any tangible thing; or
3. Any other document or electronically stored information not covered
by subparagraph 1. or 2. of this paragraph that is created or received
by, or coming under the jurisdiction of, any state agency that
documents the organization, function, policies, decisions, procedures,
operations, or other activities of the agency.
(2) (a) Each state agency is for all purposes, including in any action brought by the
Attorney General on behalf of the Commonwealth under the authority of
this chapter, KRS Chapter 367, or common law, the custodian of its own
records and shall be in possession, custody, or control of its own records;
and
(b) Except for records of the office of the Attorney General, the records of each
state agency are not in the possession, custody, or control of the Attorney
General.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 15 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Any action brought by the Attorney General, whether under this chapter, KRS
Chapter 367, common law, or otherwise, shall be commenced within ten (10)
years after the cause of action accrued unless the statute under which the
Attorney General is bringing the action provides a different fixed period of time.
Page 2 of 10
BR103500.100 - 1035 - XXXX 3/11/2026 3:18 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1035
(2) For purposes of this section, a cause of action shall be deemed to accrue at the
time the injury or violation on which the action is based is first discovered by the
Attorney General or in the exercise of reasonable care should have been
discovered by the Attorney General, whichever is later.
Section 4. KRS 13B.140 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Except as provided in KRS 452.005, all final orders of an agency shall be
subject to judicial review in accordance with[ the provisions of] this chapter.
(b) A party shall institute an appeal by filing a petition in the Circuit Court of
venue, as provided in the agency's enabling statutes, within thirty (30) days
after the final order of the agency is mailed or delivered by personal service.
If venue for appeal is not stated in the enabling statutes, a party may appeal to
Franklin Circuit Court or the Circuit Court of the county in which the
appealing party resides or operates a place of business.
(c) [Copies of the petition shall be served by the petitioner upon the agency and
all parties of record. ]The petition shall include the names and addresses of all
parties to the proceeding and the agency involved, and a statement of the
grounds on which the review is requested. The petition shall be accompanied
by a copy of the final order. Copies of the petition shall be served by the
petitioner upon the agency and all parties of record.
(d) The hearing officer shall not be named as a party in any Circuit Court
action seeking judicial review of the final order of any agency, and shall
have no duty to defend his or her decision in Circuit Court or any
subsequent proceeding.
(2) A party may file a petition for judicial review only after the party has exhausted all
administrative remedies available within the agency whose action is being
challenged, and within any other agency authorized to exercise administrative
review.
Page 3 of 10
BR103500.100 - 1035 - XXXX 3/11/2026 3:18 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1035
(3) Within twenty (20) days after the service of the petition, or within further time
allowed by the court, the agency shall transmit to the reviewing court the original or
a certified copy of the official record of the proceeding under review. By stipulation
of all parties to the review proceedings, the record may be shortened. The court may
require or permit subsequent correction or additions to the official record. If the
court requests a transcript of proceedings that have not been transcribed, the cost of
the transcription shall be paid by the party initiating the appeal, unless otherwise
agreed to by all parties.
(4) A petition for judicial review shall not automatically stay a final order pending the
outcome of the review, unless:
(a) An automatic stay is provided by statute upon appeal or at any point in the
administrative proceedings;
(b) A stay is permitted by the agency and granted upon request; or
(c) A stay is ordered by the Circuit Court of jurisdiction upon petition.
Section 5. KRS 216B.115 is amended to read as follows:
(1) An appeal to the Franklin Circuit Court may be taken from any final decision of the
cabinet with respect to a certificate-of-need application, a certificate of need, or a
license, by any party to the proceedings.
(2) (a) An appeal may be taken by filing a petition for review in the Franklin Circuit
Court within thirty (30) days after notice of the final decision unless a request
for reconsideration has been filed, in which case the petition shall be filed
within fifteen (15) days of the cabinet's decision not to reconsider or notice of
its decision on reconsideration.
(b) The petition shall state with specificity[completely] the grounds upon which
the review is sought and shall assign all errors relied upon.
(c) The petitioner shall serve a copy of the petition to each person who was a
party to the proceedings.
Page 4 of 10
BR103500.100 - 1035 - XXXX 3/11/2026 3:18 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1035
(d) Summons shall be issued upon the petition directing the adverse party or
parties to file an answer within twenty (20) days after service of summons.
(e) The cabinet shall, within thirty (30) days of[upon] being served with the
summons[ and within thirty (30) days thereafter], file a copy of the record,
duly certified by the secretary, with the cost of the record to be taxed as costs
upon appeal. In lieu of filing of the record, an abstract of the record[thereof]
may be filed if all parties to the appeal agree.
(3) In any appeal to the Franklin Circuit Court under this section, neither the
Attorney General, nor the Office of Administrative Hearings within the
Department of Law, nor the hearing officer shall be named as a party to the
action and shall have no duty to defend the final order of the cabinet in the
Circuit Court or any subsequent proceedings.
Section 6. KRS 322A.030 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board shall meet at least once each calendar year and at other times deemed
necessary by the chair or a quorum of the board upon being given ten (10) days'
notice.
(2) A roster showing the names and places of business of all registered professional
geologists shall be published by the secretary of the board each year. Copies of this
roster shall be made available to each person registered, placed on file with the
secretary of the board, and furnished to the public upon request.
(3) The board shall pass upon the qualifications of applicants for registration.
(4) The board shall require from applicants for registration evidence of their
qualifications and shall judge each applicant on evidence of the applicant's
professional competency and integrity in accordance with administrative
regulations promulgated by the board.
(5) The board may promulgate administrative regulations consistent with the provisions
of this chapter appropriate and necessary to the conduct of its responsibilities and
Page 5 of 10
BR103500.100 - 1035 - XXXX 3/11/2026 3:18 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1035
duties.
(6) The board shall promulgate by administrative regulation a code of professional
conduct, a copy of which shall be distributed to every registered geologist. Mailing
of a copy of this code to persons listed in the roster maintained under subsection (2)
of this section shall constitute due notice to all registrants. The board may revise
and amend the code of ethics from time to time, subject to the consent of the
majority of the registrants, and shall notify each registrant in writing of any
revisions or amendments.
(7) The board may take appropriate disciplinary action as provided[ for] in KRS
322A.100, but only after written notice has been given to the person against whom
action may be taken[concerned] and the person is afforded an opportunity for a
hearing to be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.
(8) Any person or organization may prefer charges of fraud, deceit, gross negligence,
or misconduct against any registrant. The charges shall be in writing, shall be sworn
to by the person or officer of the organization making them, and shall then be filed
with the board.
(9) Any Kentucky resident[ who feels] aggrieved by any final order of the board may
appeal to the Circuit Court of the county where the person resides or where the
person has his or her principal office in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B. Any
out-of-state resident[ who feels] aggrieved by any final order of the board may
appeal to the Franklin Circuit Court in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.
(10) [The Attorney General or any assistants designated by him or her shall act as legal
advisers to the board and render legal assistance as the board may from time to time
require. ]The board may employ private counsel at its discretion. The cost of private
counsel shall be paid exclusively from funds of the board.
(11) The board shall establish and maintain necessary offices within this
Commonwealth, employ personnel as necessary, and prescribe their duties and
Page 6 of 10
BR103500.100 - 1035 - XXXX 3/11/2026 3:18 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1035
compensation.
(12) For the purposes of enforcing the provisions of this chapter, investigating
complaints or suspected violations of this chapter, and notifying proper law
enforcement authorities, the board may:
(a) Administer oaths;
(b) Receive evidence;
(c) Interview persons;
(d) Issue subpoenas; and
(e) Require production of books, papers, documents, or other evidence.
Section 7. KRS 367.160 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) All departments, agencies, officers, and employees of the Commonwealth
shall fully cooperate with the Attorney General in carrying out the functions
of KRS 367.120 to 367.300.
(b) This section and the other provisions of KRS 367.110 to 367.300 shall not
be interpreted or construed to abrogate or otherwise conflict with any
provision of Section 2 of this Act.
(2) The persons designated by the Attorney General as utility consumer intervenors
shall have the same access to material evidence and information of the Public
Service Commission relating to any case before it as other parties to the case.
(3) The persons designated by the Attorney General as health insurance consumer
intervenors shall have the same access to material evidence and information of the
commissioner of the Department of Insurance relating to any health insurance rate
hearings before it as other parties to the hearing.
Section 8. KRS 403.213 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky child support guidelines may be used by the parent, custodian, or
agency substantially contributing to the support of the child as the basis for periodic
updates of child support obligations and for modification of child support orders for
Page 7 of 10
BR103500.100 - 1035 - XXXX 3/11/2026 3:18 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1035
health care.[ The provisions of] Any decree respecting child support may be
modified only as to installments accruing subsequent to the filing of the motion for
modification and only upon a showing of a material change in circumstances that is
substantial and continuing.
(2) Application of the Kentucky child support guidelines to the circumstances of the
parties at the time of the filing of a motion or petition for modification of the child
support order which results in equal to or greater than a fifteen percent (15%)
change in the amount of support due per month shall be rebuttably presumed to be a
material change in circumstances. Application which results in less than a fifteen
percent (15%) change in the amount of support due per month shall be rebuttably
presumed not to be a material change in circumstances[. For the one (1) year period
immediately following enactment of this statute, the presumption of material
change shall be a twenty-five percent (25%) change in the amount of child support
due rather than the fifteen percent (15%) stated above].
(3) Unless otherwise agreed in writing or expressly provided in the decree,[ provisions
for] the support of a child shall be terminated by emancipation of the child unless
the child is a high school student when he or she reaches the age of eighteen (18).
In cases where the child becomes emancipated because of age, but not due to
marriage, while still a high school student, the court-ordered support shall continue
while the child is a high school student, but not beyond completion of the school
year during which the child reaches the age of nineteen (19) years.[ Provisions for]
The support of the child shall not be terminated by the death of a parent obligated to
support the child. If a parent obligated to pay support dies, the amount of support
may be modified, revoked, or commuted to a lump-sum payment, to the extent just
and appropriate in the circumstances. Emancipation of the child shall not terminate
the obligation of child support arrearages that accrued while the child was an
unemancipated minor.
Page 8 of 10
BR103500.100 - 1035 - XXXX 3/11/2026 3:18 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1035
(4) The child support guidelines table shall be reviewed at least once every four (4)
years by a commission consisting of the following persons:
(a)[ The secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or a supervisory
staff person designated by him;
(b)] Two (2) members of the Kentucky Bar Association who have at least six (6)
consecutive years' experience and are presently practicing domestic relations
cases, one (1) member from a metropolitan or large urban area and one (1)
member from a less populated area;
(b)[(c)] Two (2) Circuit Judges appointed by the Chief Justice of the Kentucky
Supreme Court, one (1) from a metropolitan or large urban area, and one (1)
from a less populated area;
(c)[(d)] One (1) District Judge appointed by the Chief Justice of the Kentucky
Supreme Court;
(d)[(e)] Two (2) county attorneys appointed by the president of the County
Attorneys Association, one (1) from a metropolitan or large urban area and
one (1) from a less populated area;
(e)[(f)] The Attorney General or his or her designee, who shall be an attorney
from his or her office;
(f)[(g)] One (1) person who is a custodial parent;
(g)[(h)] One (1) person who is a noncustodial parent;
(h)[(i)] One (1) person who is a parent with split custody; and
(i)[(j)] One (1) child advocate.
The members designated in paragraphs (f)[(g)] to (i)[(j)] of this subsection shall be
appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3) names for each category
submitted by the Attorney General[Cabinet for Health and Family Services]. If the
status of one (1) of these members changes, the member shall be replaced through
appointment by the Governor from a list of three (3) names submitted by the
Page 9 of 10
BR103500.100 - 1035 - XXXX 3/11/2026 3:18 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1035
Attorney General[cabinet].
(5) The commission shall make a recommendation to the Kentucky General Assembly
to ensure that the child support guidelines table results in a determination of
appropriate child support amounts.
Page 10 of 10
BR103500.100 - 1035 - XXXX 3/11/2026 3:18 PM Jacketed